third_party/liblouis/src/tables/fr-bfu-g2.ctb
# liblouis: Unified French Grade 2 Table
###############################################################################
# BRLTTY - A background process providing access to the Linux console (when in
#          text mode) for a blind person using a refreshable braille display.
#
# Copyright (C) 1995-2004 by The BRLTTY Team. All rights reserved.
#
# BRLTTY comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY.
#
# This is free software, placed under the terms of the
# GNU General Public License, as published by the Free Software
# Foundation.  Please see the file COPYING for details.
#
# Web Page: http://mielke.cc/brltty/
#
# This software is maintained by Dave Mielke <dave@mielke.cc>.
###############################################################################

# Auteurs:
#
#	Nicolas Pitre <nico@cam.org>
#	Michel such <michel.such@free.fr>
#
# Référence:
#
#	Index de l'abrégé orthographique français étendu, lecture et écriture
#	Révision 1993
#	Service de production Braille, Institut Nazareth et Louis-Braille
#	Longueuil (Québec)

# Contracted Unified French Table
# --------------------------------

include fr-bfu-comp6.utb

###
### 1. Assemblages de lettres représentés par un seul symbole,
###    et finales représentées par deux ou trois symboles;
###

punctuation ' 6		so the line below compiles
letsign 6
noletsignafter '.\X2019\X0092

sign ^ 4					so the line: "before con always ar 4" compiles
sign ~ 5

class voy aeiouyéàèùâêîôûëïüAEIOUYÉÀÈÙÂÊËïü
class con bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvwxzBCÇDFGHJKLMNPQRSTVWXZ
class bmp bmpBMP
class apost '\X2019\X0092

endword able 45
endword ables 45-234
always ai 34
endword ait 146
endword aits 146-234
before con always an 2
endword ant 1456
endword ants 1456-234
before con always ar 4
endword ar 4
endword ation 16
endword ations 16-234
always au 13

always bl 45
before voy always br 23

always ch 12356
before voy always cl 146
before con begword com 36
before con always con 25
prfword cons	14-346-234
before voy always cr 25

before con begword dis 256
before voy always dr 1456

endword elle 456
endword elles 456-234
before con always em 345
before con always en 26
endword en 26
endword ent 126
endword ents 126-234
before con midword er 236
endword er 236
begword es 156
endword es 156
word eu 15-136
always eu 5
before con always eur 46
endword eur 46
before con always ex 1346
endword ez 1356

before voy always fl 126
before voy always fr 16

before voy always gl 345
always gn 2356
before voy always gr 12456

always ien 256
always ieu 6
before bmp begword im 246
begword  in 35
before con always in 35
endword in 35
before con always ion 3456
endword ion 3456
endword ition 246
endword itions 246-234

before voy after voy always ll 456

always oi 23456
before con always om 2456
endword om 2456
before con always on 346
endword on 346
before con always or 56
endword or 56
always ou 1256
before con always our 12346
endword our 12346

before voy always pl 1246
before voy always pr 235
before con always pro 235

always qu 12345
endword que 12345
endword ques 12345-234

before con begword re 3

before voy after voy always ss 2346

before voy always tr 356
before con begword trans 356
before voy after voy always tt 2456

before con always ui 23
endword uin 136-35
endword uins 136-35-234

endword ablement 45-134
endword ablements 45-134-234
endword bilité 12-123-2345
endword bilités 12-123-2345-234
endword ellement 456-134
endword ellements 456-134-234
endword logie 123-1245
endword logies 123-1245-234
endword quement 12345-134
endword quements 12345-134-234
endword tement 2345-134
endword tements 2345-134-234
endword ttement 2345-2345-134
endword ttements 2345-2345-134-234
endword vement 1236-134
endword vements 1236-134-234

before con always ain 1-35
endword ain 1-35
before con always oin 135-35
endword oin 135-35

before con begword recom 3-36
before con begword redis 3-256
before con begword retrans 3-356
before con begword incom 35-36
before con begword indis 35-256
before con begword intrans 35-356
begword ines 35-156

prfword tient 2345-256-2345
prfword vient 1236-256-2345
endword ient 24-126
word balbutient 12-1-123-12-136-2345-24-126
word initient 35-24-2345-24-126
word dévient 145-123456-1236-24-126
word envient 1235-26-1236-24-126

sufword bleu 45-15-136
before con always brui 12-1235-23
endword clait 14-123-146
before voy always concr 14-346-25
endword drant 145-1235-1456
always drô 145-1235-1456
endword en? 15-1345-26
always ien. 24-26-256
before voy always propr 235-135-235
before con begword ren 1235-26
always ssè 234-234-2346
word (en 236-15-1345
word (la 236-123-1

###
### 2. Mots représentés par un seul symbole
###

word a 1
word à 12356
word ai 34
word au 13
word aux 13-1346
word bien 12
word biens 12-234
word ce 14
word celui 36
word cet 146
word dans 1456
word de 145
word dès 256
word du 236
word elle 1356
word elles 1356-234
word en 26
word est 156
word et 23456
word été 2356
word étés 2356-234
word faire 124
word grand 12456
word grands 12456-234
word il 24
word ils 24-234
word je 245
word la 3
word le 123
word les 345
word lui 3456
word mais 1346
word me 134
word même 126
word mêmes 126-234
word ne 1345
word nous 135
word on 346
word ou 1256
word par 1234
word plus 1246
word pour 12346
word puis 235
word que 12345
word qui 1245
word quoi 123456
word rien 1235
word riens 1235-234
word sans 2346
word se 234
word si 35
word son 246
word sons 246-234
word sous 356
word sur 125
word te 2345
word tous 2456
word tout 16
word un 136
word uns 136-234
word vous 1236
word y 13456

begword c' 14-3
begword d' 145-3
begword j' 245-3
begword l' 123-3
begword m' 134-3
begword n' 1345-3
begword s' 234-3
begword t' 2345-3

###
### 3. Mots représentés par deux ou plusieurs symboles
###

word absolu		1-12
word absolus		1-12-234
contraction abs		1-12-234
word absolue		1-12-15
word absolues		1-12-156
word absolument		1-12-134
prfword action		1-3456
prfword actions		1-3456-234
prfword actionnaire	1-3456-1235
prfword actionnaires	1-3456-1235-234
word affaire		1-124-124
word affaires		1-124-124-234
word afin		1-124
word ailleurs		34-136
word ainsi		1-24
word alors		1-123
word amour		1-134
contraction am 1-134
word amours		1-134-234
word amoureuse		1-134-234-15
word amoureuses		1-134-234-156
word amoureusement	1-134-234-134
word amoureux		1-134-1346
word apparemment	1-1234-134
word apparence		1-1234-14
word apparences		1-1234-14-234
word apparent		1-1234
word apparents		1-1234-234
word apparente		1-1234-15
word apparentes		1-1234-156
word après		1-235
word assez		1-1356
word attentif		1-2345-124
word attentifs		1-2345-124-234
word attention		1-2345
word attentions		1-2345-234
word attentive		1-2345-1236
word attentives		1-2345-1236-234
word attentivement	1-2345-1236-134
word aucun		13-14
word aucune		13-1345
word aucunement		13-1345-134
word auparavant		13-1234
word auprès		13-235
word auquel		13-12345-123
word aussi		13-234
word aussitôt		13-2345
word autour		13-1235
word autre		13-356
word autres		13-356-234
word autrefois		13-124
word autrement		13-356-134
word auxquelles		13-1346-12345-123-123-234
word auxquels		13-1346-12345-123-234
word avance		1-1236-14
word avances		1-1236-14-234
word avancement		1-1236-14-134
word avant		1-1236
word avants		1-1236-234
word avantage		1-1236-1245
contraction avg	1-1236-1245
word avantages		1-1236-1245-234
word avantageuse	1-1236-1245-234-15
word avantageuses	1-1236-1245-234-156
word avantageusement	1-1236-1245-234-134
word avantageux		1-1236-1245-1346
word avec		1-14
word avoir		1-1235
word avoirs		1-1235-234
word ayant		1-13456

word beaucoup		12-14
word besogne		12-2356
word besognes		12-2356-234
word besogneuse		12-2356-234-15
word besogneuses		12-2356-234-156
word besogneusement		12-2356-234-134
word besogneux		12-2356-1346
word besoin		12-35
word besoins		12-35-234
prfword bête		12-126
prfword bêtes		12-126-234
prfword bêtement		12-126-134
prfword bêtements		12-126-134-234
word bienfaisance	12-124-14
word bienfaisances	12-124-14-234
word bienfait		12-124
contraction bf 12-124
word bienfaits		12-124-234
word bienfaiteur	12-124-46
word bienfaiteurs	12-124-46-234
word bienheureuse	12-125-234-15
word bienheureuses	12-125-234-156
word bienheureux	12-125-1346
word bientôt		12-2345
word bienveillance	12-1236-14
word bienveillances	12-1236-14-234
word bienveillant	12-1236
word bienveillants	12-1236-234
word bienveillante	12-1236-15
word bienveillantes	12-1236-156
word bizarre		12-1356
word bizarres		12-1356-234
word bizarrement	12-1356-134
word bonheur		12-125
word bonheurs		12-125-234
word bonjour		12-245
word bonjours		12-245-234
word bonne		12-1345
word bonnes		12-1345-234
word bonnement		12-1345-134
word bonté		12-135
word bontés		12-135-234
word boulevard		12-145
contraction bd 12-145
word boulevards		12-145-234
word braille		23-123
word brailles		23-123-234
word branchage		23-12356-1245
word branchages		23-12356-1245-234
word branche		23-12356
word branches		23-12356-234
word branchement	23-12356-134
word branchements	23-12356-134-234
word brave		23-1236
word braves		23-1236-234
word bravement		23-1236-134
word bruit		23-2345
word bruits		23-2345-234
word brusque		23-12345
word brusques		23-12345-234
word brusquement	23-12345-134
word budget		12-1245
word budgets		12-1245-234
word budgétaire		12-1245-1235
word budgétaires	12-1245-1235-234
word budgétairement	12-1245-1235-134
